Washington statutes.
RCW 19.146.030

Written disclosure of fees and costs—Rules—Contents—Lock-in agreement terms—Excess fees limited.

(1) Within three business days following receipt of a loan application from a borrower, a mortgage broker or loan originator must provide to the borrower a full written disclosure containing an itemization and explanation of all fees and costs that the borrower is required to pay in connection with obtaining a residential mortgage loan, and specifying the fee or fees which inure to the benefit of the mortgage broker and other such disclosures as may be required by rule. A good faith estimate of a fee or cost must be provided if the exact amount of the fee or cost is not determinable.

(2) The written disclosure must contain the following information:

(a) The annual percentage rate, finance charge, amount financed, total amount of all payments, number of payments, amount of each payment, amount of points or prepaid interest and the conditions and terms under which any loan terms may change between the time of disclosure and closing of the loan; and if a variable rate, the circumstances under which the rate may increase, any limitation on the increase, the effect of an increase, and an example of the payment terms resulting from an increase. Disclosure in compliance with the requirements of the truth in lending act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 and Regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. Part 1026, as now or hereafter amended, is in compliance with the disclosure requirements of this subsection;

(b) The itemized costs of any credit report, appraisal, title report, title insurance policy, mortgage insurance, escrow fee, property tax, insurance, structural or pest inspection, and any other third-party provider's costs associated with the residential mortgage loan. Disclosure through good faith estimates of settlement services and special information booklets in compliance with the requirements of the real estate settlement procedures act, 12 U.S.C. Sec. 2601, and Regulation X, 24 C.F.R. Part 1024, as now or hereafter amended, is in compliance with the disclosure requirements of this subsection;

(c) If applicable, the cost, terms, duration, and conditions of a lock-in agreement and whether a lock-in agreement has been entered, and whether the lock-in agreement is guaranteed by the mortgage broker or lender, and if a lock-in agreement has not been entered, disclosure in a form acceptable to the director that the disclosed interest rate and terms are subject to change;

(d) If applicable, a statement that if the borrower is unable to obtain a loan for any reason, the mortgage broker must, within five days of a written request by the borrower, give copies of any appraisal, title report, or credit report paid for by the borrower to the borrower, and transmit the appraisal, title report, or credit report to any other mortgage broker or lender to whom the borrower directs the documents to be sent;

(e) Whether and under what conditions any lock-in fees are refundable to the borrower; and

(f) A statement providing that moneys paid by the borrower to the mortgage broker for third-party provider services are held in a trust account and any moneys remaining after payment to third-party providers will be refunded.

(3) If subsequent to the written disclosure being provided under this section, a mortgage broker or loan originator enters into a lock-in agreement with a borrower or represents to the borrower that the borrower has entered into a lock-in agreement, then no less than three business days thereafter including Saturdays, the mortgage broker or loan originator must deliver or send by first-class mail to the borrower a written confirmation of the terms of the lock-in agreement, which must include a copy of the disclosure made under subsection (2)(c) of this section.

(4) A mortgage broker or loan originator on behalf of a mortgage broker must not charge any fee that inures to the benefit of the mortgage broker if it exceeds the fee disclosed on the written disclosure pursuant to this section, unless (a) the need to charge the fee was not reasonably foreseeable at the time the written disclosure was provided and (b) the mortgage broker or loan originator on behalf of a mortgage broker has provided to the borrower, no less than three business days prior to the signing of the loan closing documents, a clear written explanation of the fee and the reason for charging a fee exceeding that which was previously disclosed. However, if the borrower's closing costs on the final settlement statement, excluding prepaid escrowed costs of ownership as defined by rule, does not exceed the total closing costs in the most recent good faith estimate, excluding prepaid escrowed costs of ownership as defined by rule, no other disclosures are required by this subsection.

[ 2015 c 229 s 8; 2006 c 19 s 5; 1997 c 106 s 4; 1994 c 33 s 18; 1993 c 468 s 12; 1987 c 391 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—1997 c 106: See note following RCW 19.146.010.

Adoption of rules—Severability—1993 c 468: See notes following RCW 19.146.0201.

Effective dates—1993 c 468: See note following RCW 19.146.200.